Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1699.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.761, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Social skill game. Sections 609.755 and 609.76 do not prohibit tournaments or contests that satisfy all of the following requirements: (1) the tournament or contest consists of the card games of chance commonly known as cribbage, skat, sheepshead, bridge, euchre, new text begin hasenpfeffer, new text end pinochle, gin, 500, smear, Texas hold'em, or whist; (2) the tournament or contest does not provide any direct financial benefit to the promoter or organizer; (3) the value of all prizes awarded for each tournament or contest does not exceed $200; and (4) for a tournament or contest involving Texas hold'em: (i) no person under 18 years of age may participate; (ii) the payment of an entry fee or other consideration for participating is prohibited; (iii) the value of all prizes awarded to an individual winner of a tournament or contest at a single location may not exceed $200 each day; and (iv) the organizer or promoter must ensure that reasonable accommodations are made for players with disabilities. Accommodations to the table and the cards shall include the announcement of the cards visible to the entire table and the use of Braille cards for players who are blind. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end